Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70A.15.4010 and 2020 c 20 s 1124 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "A major employer" means a private or public employer, including state agencies, that employs ((one hundred))100 or more full-time employees at a single worksite ((who begin their regular workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m.)) on weekdays for at least ((twelve))12 continuous months during the year.(2)(a) "Affected urban growth area" means:(i) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, whose boundaries contain a state highway segment exceeding the ((one hundred))100 person hours of delay threshold calculated by the department of transportation, and any contiguous urban growth areas; and(ii) An urban growth area, designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, containing a jurisdiction with a population over ((seventy thousand))70,000 that adopted a commute trip reduction ordinance before the year 2000, and any contiguous urban growth areas.(b) Affected urban growth areas will be listed by the department of transportation in the rules for chapter 329, Laws of 2006 using the criteria identified in (a) of this subsection.(3) "Base year" means the ((twelve-month))12-month period commencing when a major employer is determined to be participating by the local jurisdiction, on which commute trip reduction goals shall be based.(4) "Certification" means a determination by a regional transportation planning organization that a locally designated growth and transportation efficiency center program meets the minimum criteria developed in a collaborative regional process and the rules established by the department of transportation.(5) "Commute trip" means trips made from a worker's home to a worksite ((during the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m.)) on weekdays.(6) "Commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee" means the sum of the individual vehicle commute trip lengths in miles over a set period divided by the number of full-time employees during that period.(7) "Growth and transportation efficiency center" means a defined, compact, mixed-use urban area that contains jobs or housing and supports multiple modes of transportation. For the purpose of funding, a growth and transportation efficiency center must meet minimum criteria established by the commute trip reduction board under RCW 70A.15.4060, and must be certified by a regional transportation planning organization as established in RCW 47.80.020.(8) "Major employment installation" means a military base or federal reservation, excluding tribal reservations, at which there are ((one hundred))100 or more full-time employees((, who begin their regular workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m.)) on weekdays((,)) for at least ((twelve))12 continuous months during the year.(9) "Major worksite" means a building or group of buildings that are on physically contiguous parcels of land or on parcels separated solely by private or public roadways or rights-of-way, and at which there are ((one hundred))100 or more full-time employees((, who begin their regular workday between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m.)) on weekdays((,)) for at least ((twelve))12 continuous months.(10) "Person hours of delay" means the daily person hours of delay per mile in the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m., as calculated using the best available methodology by the department of transportation.(11) "Proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips" means the number of commute trips made by single-occupant automobiles divided by the number of full-time employees.--- END ---